Utah statutes.
13-7-1.   Policy and purposes of act.
It is hereby declared that the practice of discrimination on the basis of
race, color, sex, religion, ancestry, or national origin in business
establishments or places of public accommodation or in enterprises regulated
by the state endangers the health, safety, and general welfare of this state
and its inhabitants; and that such discrimination in business establishments
or places of public accommodation or in enterprises regulated by the state,
violates the public policy of this state. It is the purpose of this act to
assure all citizens full and equal availability of all goods, services and
facilities offered by business establishments and places of public
accommodation and enterprises regulated by the state without discrimination
because of race, color, sex, religion, ancestry, or national origin. The rules
of common law that statutes in derogation thereof shall be strictly construed
has no application to this act. This act shall be liberally construed with a
view to promote the policy and purposes of the act and to promote justice. The
remedies provided herein shall not be exclusive but shall be in addition to
any other remedies available at law or equity.
